Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2604
Possession of major component part
on August 26, 1983; duties.

Any wrecker or salvage dealer
required to be licensed by the board pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act having
possession on August 26, 1983, of a major component part shall include in his or her regular business
records the information required to be recorded by subdivision (2) of section
60-2602, to the extent such information is available.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 24;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 88.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.